South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S983.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Chapter 2, Title 30 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 30-2-60. Filings and records that include personal information of a defendant made pursuant to Chapters 37 and 40 of Title 27, including those concluded by Orders of Eviction or Writ of Ejectment, cases resolved by settlement, or resolved by subsequent payment for the judgment that satisfied any debt, must be removed from the public index and any publicly accessible files available for public record five years after the final disposition or filing if no additional filing is recorded. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----